Arkansas, session 2025, HB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends this act to:
(1) Clarify the law concerning the collection and distribution
of sums collected by a district court; and
(2) Provide a mechanism for cities and incorporated towns that
do not operate a district court and do not have a police department to
receive the appropriate distribution of sums collected by the district court
to ensure remediation.

*CEB046*
04-01-2025 10:13:02 CEB046

As Engrossed: H2/18/25 H3/5/25 H4/1/25 HB1178
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-42-112(a), concerning municipal
attorneys for cities of the second class and incorporated towns, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) A city of the second class or an incorporated town that chooses
not to have an office of city attorney may contract with an attorney for
legal representation.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-17-707 is amended to read as follows:
16-17-707. Separate accounting records of fines, etc. — Disbursements.
(a) The district court clerk shall keep three (3) separate accounting
records of all fines, penalties, forfeitures, fees, and costs received by him
or her for any of the officers of the town, city, or county, as provided in
this subchapter:
(1) The first class of accounting records shall embrace all sums
collected in the district court in:
(A) all All nontraffic cases which are misdemeanors or
violations of the town or city ordinances of a town or city in the district
where the arresting or citing officer was a law enforcement officer or code
enforcement officer employed by the town or city; and
(B) all All cases which are misdemeanors or violations
under state law or traffic offenses which are misdemeanors or violations
under state law or town or city ordinance committed within the corporate
limits of the town or city where the court sits, where the arresting officer
was a police officer or other officer of the town or city, a Division of
Arkansas State Police officer or other certified law enforcement officer of
the state, or an officer of a private or public college or university located
within the corporate limits of the town or city where the court sits;
(2) The second class of accounting records shall embrace all
sums collected in the district court in all nontraffic cases which are
misdemeanors or violations of county ordinances or are misdemeanors or
violations of any of the laws of the state where the arresting officer was
the county sheriff or a deputy sheriff or was not a police officer or other
officer of the a town or city where the court sits in the district, and the
offense was committed outside the corporate limits of the town or city where
the court sits, and in all other criminal or traffic proceedings not
specifically enumerated in this section; and
04-01-2025 10:13:02 CEB046

As Engrossed: H2/18/25 H3/5/25 H4/1/25 HB1178
(3)(A) The third class of accounting records shall embrace all
sums collected in the district court in all civil and small claims cases.
(B) The uniform filing fee collected under § 16-17-705
shall be remitted to the city administration of justice fund.
(C) The uniform court costs collected under § 16-10-305
shall be remitted to the city administration of justice fund.
(D) All other fees and interest earned on the court
account shall be disbursed to the treasurers of the political subdivisions
which contribute to the expense of the district court in accordance with a
written agreement among the political subdivisions.
(b)(1)(A) After deducting the fees due the police department and
marshal's office and sheriff's office, the district court shall pay into the
each town or city treasury all sums collected from the first class of
accounting records for that town or city.
(B) The district court shall pay all sums collected from
the second class of accounting records into the county treasury.
(2) Any district court that is funded solely by the county shall
pay all sums collected from the first or second class of accounting records
into the county treasury and shall pay all uniform filing fees and court
costs collected into the county administration of justice fund.
(3) A town or city that has a police department and does not
operate a district court shall receive only the prorated sums collected as
provided in § 16-17-1203.
(4) Direct monetary settlements shall be made with state
entities or agencies as provided by law.
(c) All disbursements from all three (3) classes of accounting records
shall be pursuant to the provisions set forth in the Arkansas District Courts
Accounting Law, § 16-10-201 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1203(a)(1), concerning the procedure
for cost sharing for expenses of a district court, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) Any town or city that has a police department but does not
have a district court may contribute to the operational expenses of the
nearest district court in the county where the town or city is located
pursuant to a written agreement.
04-01-2025 10:13:02 CEB046

As Engrossed: H2/18/25 H3/5/25 H4/1/25 HB1178
(B) A written agreement is mandatory and is to be entered into
between the governing body of the town or city where the district court sits
and the governing bodies of the political subdivisions that contribute to the
operational expenses of the district court.

/s/R. Scott Richardson






























04-01-2025 10:13:02 CEB046